Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-402
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Health Care Facility Licensure Act and the Nebraska Nursing Home Act is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare by providing for the licensure of health care facilities and health care services in the State of Nebraska and for the development, establishment, and enforcement of basic standards for such facilities and services.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 2.

Nebraska Nursing Home Act, see section 71-6037.